New Jersey, session 221, A1723.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section)  This act shall be known and may be cited as the Defense of Community Standards Act. 2.    (New section)  The Legislature finds and declares: Sexually oriented businesses require special supervision from the public safety agencies of this State in order to protect and preserve the health, safety, morals and welfare of the patrons, contractors and employees of these businesses, as well as the residents of the State; There is convincing documented evidence that sexually oriented businesses, because of their very nature, have a deleterious effect on both the existing businesses around them and the surrounding residential areas adjacent to them and contribute to increased crime, particularly in the overnight hours, and the downgrading of property values; The Legislature desires to minimize and control these adverse effects in order to protect the health, safety and welfare of the States residents, to protect the States residents from increased crime, to preserve the quality of life, local property values and the character of neighborhoods surrounding sexually oriented businesses, and to deter the spread of blight; The reduction of crime and the preservation of the aesthetic and commercial character of the neighborhoods surrounding sexually oriented businesses is substantially in the public interest, so it is appropriate for the Legislature to provide municipalities with the authority to exert limited controls on the time, place and manner of their operation. 3.    Section 3 of P.L.1995, c.230 (C.2C:34-7) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  Except as provided in a municipal zoning ordinance adopted pursuant to N.J.S.2C:34-2, no person shall operate a sexually oriented business within [1,000] 2,500 feet of any existing sexually oriented business, or any church, synagogue, temple or other place of public worship, or any elementary or secondary school or any school bus stop, or any municipal or county playground or place of public resort and recreation, or any hospital or any child care center, or within [1,000] 2,500 feet of any area zoned for residential use.  This subsection shall not apply to a sexually oriented business already lawfully operating on the effective date of this act where another sexually oriented business, an elementary or secondary school or school bus stop, or any municipal or county playground or place of public resort and recreation, or any hospital or any child care center, is subsequently established within [1,000] 2,500 feet, or a residential district or residential lot is subsequently established within [1,000] 2,500 feet. b.    Every sexually oriented business shall be surrounded by a perimeter buffer of at least 50 feet in width with plantings, fence, or other physical divider along the outside of the perimeter sufficient to impede the view of the interior of the premises in which the business is located.  The municipality may, by ordinance, require the perimeter buffer to meet additional requirements or standards. This subsection shall not apply to a sexually oriented business already lawfully operating on the effective date of this act. c.     No sexually oriented business shall display more than two exterior signs, consisting of one identification sign and one sign giving notice that the premises are off limits to minors.  The identification sign shall be no more than 40 square feet in size. d.    A person who violates this section is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. (cf: P.L.1999, c.41, s.1) 4.    R.S.40:48-1 is amended to read as follows: 40:48-1.  Ordinances; general purpose.  The governing body of every municipality may make, amend, repeal and enforce ordinances to: Finances and property.  1. Manage, regulate and control the finances and property, real and personal, of the municipality; Contracts and contractor's bonds.  2.  Prescribe the form and manner of execution and approval of all contracts to be executed by the municipality and of all bonds to be given to it; Officers and employees; duties, terms and salaries.  3.  Prescribe and define, except as otherwise provided by law, the duties and terms of office or employment, of all officers and employees; and to provide for the employment and compensation of such officials and employees, in addition to those provided for by statute, as may be deemed necessary for the efficient conduct of the affairs of the municipality; Fees.  4.  Fix the fees of any officer or employee of the municipality for any service rendered in connection with his office or position, for which no specific fee or compensation is provided.  In the case of salaried officers or employees, such fee shall be paid into the municipal treasury; Salaries instead of fees; disposition of fees.  5.  Provide that any officer or employee receiving compensation for his services, in whole or in part by fees, whether paid by the municipality or otherwise, shall be paid a salary to be fixed in the ordinance, and thereafter all fees received by such officer or employee shall be paid into the municipal treasury; Maintain order.  6.  Prevent vice, drunkenness and immorality; to regulate sexually oriented businesses, as defined in section 2 of P.L.1995, c.167 (C.2C:12-2), in compliance with all constitutional requirements; to preserve the public peace and order; to prevent and quell riots, disturbances and disorderly assemblages; to prohibit the consumption of alcoholic beverages by underage persons on private property pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2000, c.33 (C.40:48-1.2); Punish beggars; prevention of loitering.  7. Restrain and punish drunkards, vagrants, mendicants and street beggars; to prevent loitering, lounging or sleeping in the streets, parks or public places; Auctions and noises.  8. Regulate the ringing of bells and the crying of goods and other commodities for sale at auction or otherwise, and to prevent disturbing noises; Swimming; bathing costume; prohibition of public nudity.  9. Regulate or prohibit swimming or bathing in the waters of, in, or bounding the municipality, and to regulate or prohibit persons from appearing upon the public streets, parks and places clad in bathing costumes or robes, or costumes of a similar character; regulate or prohibit persons from appearing in a state of nudity upon all lands within its borders which are under the jurisdiction of the State including, without limitation, all lands owned by, controlled by, managed by or leased by the State; Prohibit annoyance of persons or animals.  10.  Regulate or prohibit any practice tending to frighten animals, or to annoy or injure persons in the public streets; Animals; pounds; establishment and regulation.  11.  Establish and regulate one or more pounds, and to prohibit or regulate the running at large of horses, cattle, dogs, swine, goats and other animals, and to authorize their impounding and sale for the penalty incurred, and the costs of impounding, keeping and sale; to regulate or prohibit the keeping of cattle, goats or swine in any part of the municipality; to authorize the destruction of dogs running at large therein; Hucksters.  12.  Prescribe and regulate the place of vending or exposing for sale articles of merchandise from vehicles; Building regulations; wooden structures.  13.  Regulate and control the construction, erection, alteration and repair of buildings and structures of every kind within the municipality; and to prohibit, within certain limits, the construction, erection or alteration of buildings or structures of wood or other combustible material; Inflammable materials; inspect docks and buildings.  14. Regulate the use, storage, sale and disposal of inflammable or combustible materials, and to provide for the protection of life and property from fire, explosions and other dangers; to provide for inspections of buildings, docks, wharves, warehouses and other places, and of goods and materials contained therein, to secure the proper enforcement of such ordinance; Dangerous structures; removal or destruction; procedure.  15. Provide for the removal or destruction of any building, wall or structure which is or may become dangerous to life or health, or might tend to extend a conflagration; and to assess the cost thereof as a municipal lien against the premises; Chimneys and boilers.  16. Regulate the construction and setting up of chimneys, furnaces, stoves, boilers, ovens and other contrivances in which fire is used; Explosives.  17.  Regulate, in conformity with the statutes of this State, the manufacture, storage, sale, keeping or conveying of gunpowder, nitroglycerine, dynamite and other explosives; Firearms and fireworks.  18. Regulate and prohibit the sale and use of guns, pistols, firearms, and fireworks of all descriptions; Soft coal.  19.  Regulate the use of soft coal in locomotives, factories, power houses and other places; Theaters, schools, churches and public places.  20.  Regulate the use of theaters, cinema houses, public halls, schools, churches, and other places where numbers of people assemble, and the exits therefrom, so that escape therefrom may be easily and safely made in case of fire or panic; and to regulate any machinery, scenery, lights, wires and other apparatus, equipment or appliances used in all places of public amusement; Excavations.  21.  Regulate excavations below the established grade or curb line of any street, not greater than eight feet, which the owner of any land may make, in the erection of any building upon his own property; and to provide for the giving of notice, in writing, of such intended excavation to any adjoining owner or owners, and that they will be required to protect and care for their several foundation walls that may be endangered by such excavation; and to provide that in case of the neglect or refusal, for 10 days, of such adjoining owner or owners to take proper action to secure and protect the foundations of any adjacent building or other structure, that the party or parties giving such notice, or their agents, contractors or employees, may enter into and upon such adjoining property and do all necessary work to make such foundations secure, and may recover the cost of such work and labor in so protecting such adjacent property; and to make such further and other provisions in relation to the proper conduct and performance of said work as the governing body or board of the municipality may deem necessary and proper; Sample medicines.  22. Regulate and prohibit the distribution, depositing or leaving on the public streets or highways, public places or private property, or at any private place or places within any such municipality, any medicine, medicinal preparation or preparations represented to cure ailments or diseases of the body or mind, or any samples thereof, or any advertisements or circulars relating thereto, but no ordinance shall prohibit a delivery of any such article to any person above the age of 12 years willing to receive the same; Boating.  23.  Regulate the use of motor and other boats upon waters within or bounding the municipality; Fire escapes.  24.  Provide for the erection of fire escapes on buildings in the municipality, and to provide rules and regulations concerning the construction and maintenance of the same, and for the prevention of any obstruction thereof or thereon; Care of injured employees. 25.  Provide for the payment of compensation and for medical attendance to any officer or employee of the municipality injured in the performance of his duty; Bulkheads and other structures.  26.  Fix and determine the lines of bulkheads or other works or structures to be erected, constructed or maintained by the owners of lands facing upon any navigable water in front of their lands, and in front of or along any highway or public lands of said municipality, and to designate the materials to be used, and the type, height and dimensions thereof; Lifeguard.  27.  Establish, maintain, regulate and control a lifeguard upon any beach within or bordering on the municipality; Appropriation for life-saving apparatus.  28.  Appropriate moneys to safeguard people from drowning within its borders, by location of apparatus or conduct of educational work in harmony with the plans of the United States volunteer life-saving corps in this State; Fences.  29.  Regulate the size, height and dimensions of any fences between the lands of adjoining owners, whether built or erected as division or partition fences between such lands, and whether the same exist or be erected entirely or only partly upon the lands of any such adjoining owners, or along or immediately adjacent to any division or partition line of such lands.  To provide, in such ordinance, the manner of securing, fastening or shoring such fences, and for surveying the land when required by statute, and to prohibit in any such ordinance the use at a height of under 10 feet from the ground, of any device, such as wire or cable, that would be dangerous to pedestrians, equestrians, bicyclists, or drivers of off-the-road vehicles, unless that device is clearly visible to pedestrians, equestrians, bicyclists or drivers of off-the-road vehicles.  In the case of fences thereafter erected contrary to the provisions thereof, the governing body may provide for a penalty for the violation of such ordinance, and in the case of such fence or fences erected or existing at the time of the passage of any such ordinance, may provide therein for the removal, change or alteration thereof, so as to make such fence or fences comply with the provisions of any such ordinance; Advertise municipality.  30. Appropriate funds for advertising the advantages of the municipality; Government Energy Aggregation Programs.  31.  Establish programs and procedures pursuant to which the municipality may act as a government aggregator pursuant to sections 40 through 43 of P.L.1999,c.23 (C.48:3-89 through C.48:3-92), section 45 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-94), and sections 1, 2 and 6 of P.L.2003, c.24 (C.48:3-93.1 through C.48:3-93.3).  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a municipality acting as a government aggregator pursuant to P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.) shall not be deemed to be a public utility pursuant to R.S.40:62-24 or R.S.48:1-1 et seq. or be deemed to be operating any form of public utility service pursuant to R.S.40:62-1 et seq., to the extent such municipality is solely engaged in the provision of such aggregation service and not otherwise owning or operating any plant or facility for the production or distribution of gas, electricity, steam or other product as provided in R.S.40:62-12; Joint municipal action on consent for the provision of cable television service.  32.  Establish programs and procedures pursuant to which a municipality may act together with one or more municipalities in granting municipal consent for the provision of cable television service pursuant to the provisions of the "Cable Television Act," P.L.1972, c.186 (C.48:5A-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, two or more municipalities acting jointly pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1972, c.186 (C.48:5A-1 et seq.) shall not be deemed a public utility pursuant to R.S.48:1-1 et seq., to the extent those municipalities are solely engaged in granting municipal consent jointly and are not otherwise owning or operating any facility for the provision of cable television service as provided in P.L.1972, c.186 (C.48:5A-1 et seq.); Private cable television service aggregation programs.  33. Establish programs and procedures pursuant to which a municipality may employ the services of a private aggregator for the purpose of facilitating the joint action of two or more municipalities in granting municipal consent for the provision of cable television service provided that any such municipality shall adhere to the provisions of the "Cable Television Act," P.L.1972, c.186 (C.48:5A-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented, and to the provisions of the "Local Public Contracts Law," P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a municipality that employs the services of a private aggregator pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1972, c.186 (C.48:5A-1 et seq.)  shall not be deemed a public utility pursuant to R.S.48:1-1 et seq., to the extent that the municipality is solely engaged in employing the services of a private aggregator for the purpose of facilitating the joint action of two or more municipalities in granting municipal consent and is not otherwise owning or operating any facility for the provision of cable television service as provided in P.L.1972, c.186 (C.48:5A-1 et seq.); Protective Custody.  34. Provide protective custody to persons arrested for operating a motor vehicle under the influence of alcoholic beverages, any chemical substance, or any controlled dangerous substance in violation of R.S.39:4-50 as provided in section 1 of P.L.2003, c.164 (C.40:48-1.3). (cf: P.L.2003, c.164, s.2) 5.    R.S.40:52-1 is amended to read as follows: 40:52-1. The governing body may make, amend, repeal and enforce ordinances to license and regulate: a.     All vehicles used for the transportation of passengers, baggage, merchandise, and goods and chattels of every kind, and the owners and drivers of all such vehicles; and the places and premises in which or at which the different kinds of business or occupations mentioned herein are carried on and conducted. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as modifying or repealing any of the provisions of chapter 4 of Title 48 of the Revised Statutes (R.S.48:4-1 et seq.); b.    Autobuses, and the owners and drivers of all such vehicles, and to fix the fees for such licenses, which may be imposed for revenue, and to prohibit the operation of all such vehicles in the public streets or places of such municipality, unless such ordinances are complied with, whether such vehicles are operated over routes wholly or partly within the territorial limits of such municipality; the powers conferred by this section shall not be in substitution of but in addition to whatever other right, power and authority any such municipality may at any time have as to licensing, regulating, or control of the operation of such autobuses, commonly called jitneys, and this section shall not be construed as modifying or repealing any of the provisions of chapter 4 (R.S.48:4-1 et seq.) or article 3 of chapter 16 (R.S.48:16-23 et seq.) of Title 48 of the Revised Statutes; c.     Cartmen, expressmen, baggagemen, porters, common criers, hawkers, peddlers, employment agencies, pawnbrokers, junk shop-keepers, junk dealers, motor vehicle junk dealers, street sprinklers, bill posters, bill tackers, sweeps, scavengers, itinerant vendors of merchandise, medicines and remedies; and the places and premises in which or at which the different kinds of business or occupations mentioned herein are conducted and carried on; d.    Hotels, boardinghouses, lodging and rooming houses, trailer camps and camp sites, motels, furnished and unfurnished rented housing or living units and all other places and buildings used for sleeping and lodging purposes, and the occupancy thereof, restaurants and all other eating places, and the keepers thereof; e.     Automobile garages, dealers in second-hand motor vehicles and parts thereof, bathhouses, swimming pools, and the keepers thereof; f.     Theatres, cinema and show houses, opera houses, concert halls, dance halls, pool or billiard parlors, bowling alleys, exhibition grounds, and all other places of public amusement, circuses and traveling or other shows, plays, dances, exhibitions, concerts, theatrical performances, and all street parades in connection therewith, and sexually oriented businesses as defined in section 2 of P.L.1995, c.167 (C.2C:33-12.2), including employees and independent contractors performing therein; g.    Lumber and coal yards, stores for the sale of meats, groceries and provisions, dry goods and merchandise, and goods and chattels of every kind, and all other kinds of business conducted in the municipality other than herein mentioned, and the places and premises in or at which the business is conducted and carried on; street stands for the sale or distribution of newspapers, magazines, periodicals, books, and goods and merchandise or other articles; h.    Street signs and other objects projecting beyond the building line, into or over any public street or highway; i.     Auctioneers and their business, whether the auctioneers be real estate brokers engaged in selling at auction or real estate auctioneers licensed by the New Jersey Real Estate Commission; fix their fees, and license and regulate public auctions; make such regulations as the governing body of the municipality shall deem necessary, to protect the public against fraud at public auction sales, and for the safety and protection of the property of the municipality and its inhabitants, including the power to require from auctioneers a bond to the municipality, not exceeding the penal sum of $5,000.00, conditioned as the governing body shall require; j.     Sales of goods, wares and merchandise to be advertised, held out or represented, or which are advertised, held out or represented, to the public, by any means, directly or by implication, as forced sales at reduced prices or as insurance, bankruptcy, mortgage foreclosure, insolvency, removal, loss or expiration of lease or closing out sales, or as assignees', receivers' or trustees' sales or as sales of goods distrained or as sales of goods damaged by fire, smoke or water, except any sale which is to be held under a judicial order, judgment or decree or a writ issuing out of any court or to enforce any lawful lien or power of sale whether by judicial process or not or by a licensed auctioneer; to make such regulations governing the advertisement, holding out or representing to the public of such sales, and the conduct thereof, as the governing body of the municipality shall deem necessary to protect the public against fraud; to prohibit the advertising, holding out or representing to the public of any sale as being of the character above described which is not of such character and to fix license fees for the conduct of such sales and to impose penalties for the violation of any such ordinance; k.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1997, c.320.) l.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1984, c.205.) m.   The rental of real property for commercial purposes wherein the lease is for a term less than 175 consecutive days.  No ordinance adopted pursuant to this subsection shall apply to any lease or occupancy which results from a tenant holding over at the expiration or early termination of a lease with an original term in excess of 175 consecutive days, regardless of whether the holdover is month-to-month or for some other term of less than 175 consecutive days; and n.    The rental of real property for a term less than 175 consecutive days for residential purposes by a person having a permanent place of residence elsewhere. Nothing in this chapter contained shall be construed to authorize or empower the governing body of any municipality to license or regulate any person holding a license or certificate issued by any department, board, commission, or other agency of the State; provided, however, that the governing body of a municipality may make, amend, repeal and enforce ordinances to license and regulate real estate auctioneers or real estate brokers engaged in selling at auction and their business as provided in this section despite the fact that such real estate auctioneers or brokers may be licensed by the New Jersey Real Estate Commission and notwithstanding the provisions of this act or any other act. (cf: P.L.1997, c.320, s.1) 6.    (New section)  The governing body of a municipality may, by ordinance pursuant to the provisions of R.S.40:48-1, regulate the time, place and manner of operation of a sexually oriented business.  The governing body of a municipality may also require the licensure of a sexually oriented business and its employees and independent contractors pursuant to the provisions of R.S.40:52-1. For the purposes of this section, time, place and manner of operation shall mean the hours of operation of a sexually oriented business, the interior configuration of the business, including the distance between certain performers and patrons, and the degree of allowable nudity to be demonstrated by the performers employed by the business.  For the purposes of this section, performer means an employee or an independent contractor. 7.    (New section)  A sexually oriented business, as defined in section 2 of P.L.1995, c.167 (C.2C:33-12.2), shall close no later than 11:00 P.M. and shall maintain a distance of not less than six feet between its performers and patrons at all times, unless the governing body of the municipality in which a sexually oriented business is located, by ordinance, sets a later closing time and a shorter distance between the performers and patrons. 8.    This act shall take effect immediately.